Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1631
Aggrieved party; hearing; procedure.

At such hearing, the party may employ counsel, shall have the right to hear the evidence upon which the action is based, and may present evidence in opposition to the commissioner's action or in extenuation or mitigation. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. Any member of the board may preside except when a clear conflict of interest may be demonstrated. The board shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for such hearings and may utilize hearing officers to conduct the hearings and to present recommendations, including findings of fact and conclusions of law, to the board for final decision.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 31;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 31;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2831;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 31.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.